apertium-kaz.kaz.lexc
LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL

бұл%<R_SIM%>:бұл CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>:бұ CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C2%>:бұның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C2%>:мұның CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<C3SIM%>%<C3%>:бұған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C4%>:бұны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C4%>:мұны CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C6%>:бұдан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C6%>:мұнан CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C5%>:бұнда CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C5%>:мұнда CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:бұнымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:бұныменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:мұнымен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:мұныменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<S9%>:мұнікі%{n%} CASES ; ! FIXME: check "м" vs "б"
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<LATT%>:бұндағы CASES ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<LATT%>:мұндағы CASES ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>:мұндай CASES ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>:бұндай CASES ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>%<S3%>:мұндай%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>%<N1%>:мұндайлар CASES ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>%<N1%>%<S3%>:мұндайлары%{n%} CASES ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>:былай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>:бұлай CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<R_SIM%>:мұнша CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<S3%>:бұнысы%{n%} CASES ;

бұл%<R_SIM%>%<N1%>:бұлар CASES-ETC ;
бұл%<R_SIM%>%<N1%>%<S3%>:бұлары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-MINA

мына%<R_SIM%>:мына CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<C2%>:мынаның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<C3%>:мынаған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<C4%>:мынаны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<C6%>:мынадан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<C5%>:мынада CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:мынамен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:мынаменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
мына%<R_SIM%>%<S9%>:мынанікі%{n%} CASES ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<LATT%>:мынадағы CASES ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>:мынадай CASES ;
мына%<R_SIM%>:мыналай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<S3%>:мына%<R_SIM%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

мына%<R_SIM%>%<N1%>:мыналар CASES-ETC ;
мына%<R_SIM%>%<N1%>%<S3%>:мыналары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-MINAU

мынау%<R_SIM%>:мынау CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-ANA

: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<C2%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C3SIM%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C4%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C6%>:дан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<C5%>:да CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<C7%>:мен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C7%>:менен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<C2%>:нікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<LATT%>:дағы CASES ;
%<SML%>:дай CASES ;

%<N1%>:лар CASES-ETC ;
%<N1%>%<S3%>:лар%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON DemonstrativePronouns

PRON-DEM-BUL ;
PRON-DEM-MINA ;
PRON-DEM-MINAU ;
ана%<R_SIM%>:ана PRON-DEM-ANA ;

сол%<R_SIM%>:сол CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
сол%<R_SIM%>:со PRON-DEM-INFL ;
сол%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:сонымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
сол%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:соныменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
сол%<R_SIM%>%<S3%>:сонысы%{n%} CASES ;

ол%<R_SIM%>:ол CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ол%<R_SIM%>:о PRON-DEM-INFL ;
ол%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:онымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ол%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:оныменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
ол%<R_SIM%>%<S3%>:онысы%{n%} CASES ;

осы%<R_SIM%>:осы CLITICS-NO-COP ;
осы%<R_SIM%>:осы PRON-DEM-INFL ;
осы%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:осымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
осы%<R_SIM%>%<C7%>:осыменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
осы%<R_SIM%>%<S3%>:осысы%{n%} CASES ;

!!!!!!!   I N T E R R O G A T I V E

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<R_SIM%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;


LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI-CASES

: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C2%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C3SIM%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C4%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C6%>:дан CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C5%>:да CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C7%>:мен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<C7%>:менен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI

%<R_SIM%>: PRON-ITG-QAYSI-CASES ;
%<R_SIM%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANSHA

%<R_SIM%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANDAY

%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>: CASES ;
%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>%<S3%>:ы%{n%} CASES ;
%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>%<N1%>:лар CASES ;
%<R_SIM%>%<SML%>%<N1%>%<S3%>:лары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON InterrogativePronouns

қайсы:қайсы PRON-ITG-QAYSI ;
қанша:қанша PRON-ITG-QANSHA ;
қандай:қандай PRON-ITG-QANDAY ;
нәрсе:нәрсе PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "thing" ! Use/MT
не:не PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
немене:немене PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
кім:кім PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"

LEXICON PRON-QNT-POSS

%<R_SIM%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<R_SIM%>: GER-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<R_SIM%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON PRON-IND-PL

%<R_SIM%>%<N1%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<R_SIM%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<R_SIM%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASES-ETC ;
:ше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

%<R_SIM%>%<S1%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<R_SIM%>%<S2%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<R_SIM%>%<S3%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ; ! FIXME <px3sg>?
%<R_SIM%>%<S5%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<R_SIM%>%<px2pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<R_SIM%>%<px3pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<R_SIM%>%<S4%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<R_SIM%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<R_SIM%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<R_SIM%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<R_SIM%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<R_SIM%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<R_SIM%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     OTHER PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS

LEXICON N1-ABBR

%<R_ZE%>: # ;
%<R_ZE%>:%- POSSESSIVES ;
%<R_ZE%>:%- CASES-ETC ;
%<R_ZE%>: CASES-ETC ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON N1

%<R_ZE%>: # ;
%<R_ZE%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N1-Ә

:%{ә%} N1 ;            ! generate front for {I} and back for {A} - куәні, куәға
:ә%{ъ%} N1 ;  ! Dir/LR ! analyse all back forms
:ә N1 ;       ! Dir/LR ! analyse all front forms

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;       ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы",
                  ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<R_ZE%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<R_ZE%>%<N1%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сакчылары=пограничники)
                                                      !  FIXME CHECK: Is {S} needed here ?

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-PL
! for things like Олимпиада ойындары

%<R_ZE%>%<N1%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ; ! FIXME: do we want these to get <pl>??


LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<R_ZE%>: # ;
%<R_ZE%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N5

:%{☭%} N1 ;

LEXICON N6

:%{і%} N1 ;
N1 ;  ! Dir/LR     ! We want to analyse forms without %{і%}, since they're used
                   ! but "properly" we want to generate forms with %{і%}

LEXICON N-INFL-NKI

%<R_ZE%>:%{I%}н KI ; ! Dir/LR - common variant in both Kazakh and Kyrgyz
%<R_ZE%>:%{I%}ң KI ;
%<R_ZE%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON
FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP

%<R_ZEQ%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-RUS

%<R_ZEQ%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<R_ZEQ%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<R_ZEQ%>: # ;

%<R_ZEQ%>: NP-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
%<R_ZEQ%>:%- NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-COMPOUND

%<R_ZEQ%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ABBR

%<R_ZEQ%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<R_ZEQ%>:%- NP-COMMON ;

%<R_ZEQ%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR


LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<R_ZEQ%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<R_ZEQ%>%<N1%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<R_ZEQ%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<R_ZEQ%>%<N1%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<R_ZEQ%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<R_ZEQ%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything

%<R_ZEQ%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<R_ZEQ%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<R_ZEQ%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<R_ZEQ%>%<N1%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

 LEXICON Determiners
әлгі:әлгі DET-DEM ; ! "~этот"
ол:ол DET-DEM ;
мына:мына DET-DEM ;
ол:ол DET-DEM ;
сол:сол DET-DEM ;
осынау:осынау DET-DEM ;
әр:һәр DET-QNT ; ! "every" Dir/LR
бірнеше:бірнеше DET-QNT ; ! "some"
көптеген:көптеген DET-QNT ; ! "many"
көп:көп DET-QNT ; ! "many"
миллиондаған:миллиондаған DET-QNT ; ! ""
бір:бір PRON-IND ; ! "a"
кейбір:кейбір DET-IND ; ! "some"
қай%-қайсы:қай%-қайсы DET-IND ; ! "whoever"
бірер:бірер DET-IND ; ! ""
осындай:осындай DET-IND ; ! "such"
басқа:басқа DET-IND ; ! "another"
қай:қай DET-ITG ; ! "which"
қайсы:қайсы DET-ITG ; ! "which"
кім:кім DET-ITG ; ! !"whose" Use/MT
ешбір:ешбір DET-NEG ; ! "none, no"
ешқандай:ешқандай DET-NEG ; ! "no [kind of], none"
еш:еш DET-NEG ; ! "none"
өз:өз DET-REF ; ! "oneself's"
 LEXICON Nouns
Аллаһ% Тағала:аллаһ% тағала N3 ; ! Dir/LR
Будда:будда N3 ; ! ""
Раббы:раббы N3 ; ! ""
Рамазан:рамазан N3 ; ! ""
арт%-дизайн:арт%-дизайн N6 ; !
борсықтың% балалары:борсықтың% балалар N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ; ! "" ! Use/MT
депозит:депозит N5 ; ! ""
егін% шаруашылығы:егін% шаруашылығ N-COMPOUND-PX ; !
еліктеушілік:еліктеушілік N1 ; ! ""
инфляция:инфляция N5 ; ! ""
контракт:контракт N6 ; ! ""
куә:ку N1-Ә ; ! "witness"
кінә:кін N1-Ә ; ! "guilt"
күнә:күн N1-Ә ; ! "sin"
митинг:митинг N5 ; ! ""
мономәдениет:мономәдениет N1 ; !
орын% тұрғыны:орын% тұрғын N-COMPOUND-PX ; !
санкция:санкция N5 ; ! ""
субъект:субъект N6 ; ! ""
түс% түрлері:түс% түрлер N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ; ! ""
фотокомпозиция:фотокомпозиция N1 ; !
цирк% әртісі:цирк% әртіс N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
қазіргі% заман:қазіргі% заман N3 ; ! "" Use/MT
галактика:галактика N5 ; ! "galaxy"
БАҚ:БАҚ%{а%} N1-ABBR ; ! "mass media"
млн:млн%{а%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "million"
млн%.:млн%.%{а%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "million"
млрд:млрд%{а%}%{с%} N1-ABBR ; ! "billion"
мм:мм%{э%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "mm"
арт:арт N-INFL-NKI ; ! "back"
аст:аст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "under"
аст:ас%{т%} N-INFL-NKI ; ! "down side"
үст:үст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "top"
орта:орта N-INFL-NKI ; ! "middle"
артефакт:артефакт N6 ;
әрекет% шеңбер:әрекет% шеңбер N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
баған:баған N1 ; !"Use/MT"
күн% тәртібі:күн% тәртіп N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ; ! "schedule"
Олимпиада% ойындары:Олимпиада% ойындар N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ; ! "The Olympic Games"
Жазғы% Олимпиада% ойындары:Жазғы% Олимпиада% ойындар N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ; ! "The Summer Olympic Games"
толқын% ұзындық:толқын% ұзындық N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
факт:факт N6 ; ! "fact"
аяусыздық:аяусыздық N1 ; ! ""
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Ақсу%-Аюлы:Ақсу%-Аюлы NP-TOP ; ! ""
Багам% аралдары:Багам% аралдар NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! ""
Бангладеш:Бангладеш NP-TOP ; ! ""
Бірлескен% араб% эмираттары:Бірлескен% араб% эмираттар NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "UAE"
Біріккен% араб% эмираттары:Біріккен% араб% эмираттар NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "UAE"
ВДР:ВДР%{а%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! "Vietnam Democratic Republic"
Вестфалия:Вестфалия NP-TOP ; !"Use/MT"
Исламабад:Исламабад NP-TOP ; !"Use/MT"
Кеңес% Одағы:Кеңес% Одақ NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "Soviet Union"
Маршалл% Аралдары:Маршалл% Аралдар NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "Marshall Islands"
Эфиопия:Эфиопия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Қырғыз% АССР:Қырғыз% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ;
Қазақ% КСР:Қазақ% КСР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Қазақ% АССР:Қазақ% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Украина% ССР:Украина% ССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Татар% АССР:Татар% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Баймағамбет:Баймағамбет NP-ANT-M ; ! "Baymağambet" (Kazakh)
Венди:Венди NP-ANT-F ; !"Use/MT"
Аб:Аб NP-ANT-M ; !"Use/MT"
Кая:Кая NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Кристоф:Кристоф NP-ANT-M ; !"Use/MT"
Нұрзила:Нұрзила NP-ANT-F ; ! "Nurzıyla" (Arabic)
Сталбек:Сталбек NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Хадиша:Хадиша NP-ANT-F ; ! "Xadıysha" (Arabic)
Горький:Горький NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Репин:Репин NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Коряков:Коряков NP-COG-M ; !"Use/MT"
Гитлер:Гитлер NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Кроули:Кроули NP-COG-MF ; !"Use/MT"
Онищенко:Онищенко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Фернандес:Фернандес NP-COG-MF ; !"Use/MT"
Бағдад:Бағдад NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Кухруд:Кухруд NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Серхед:Серхед NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Тебриз:Тебриз NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Шираз:Шираз NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
венгерше:венгерше ADV-LANG ; ! "" FIXME
ксозаша:ксозаша ADV-LANG ; ! ""
немісше:немісше ADV-LANG ; ! "German"
сербхорватша:сербхорватша ADV-LANG ; ! ""
ұйғұрша:ұйғұрша ADV-LANG ; ! "Uyghur"
LEXICON Guesser
Боголюбский:Боголюбский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
ЖХЛ:ЖХЛ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
БХООО:БХООО NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
ЖКО:ЖКО NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
МТ:МТ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
LEXICON Common ! <- future
Бум:Бум NP ;
Жантық:Жантық NP ;
Контиола:Контиола NP ;
Нұрғазина:Нұрғазина NP ;
Ыбыраева:Ыбыраева NP ;
